Rhode Island, session 2025, SB402.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 39-31-2, 39-31-3, 39-31-4, 39-31-5 and 39-31-7 of the General
Laws in Chapter 39-31 entitled "Affordable Clean Energy Security Act" are hereby amended to
read as follows:
39-31-2. Purpose.
The purpose of this chapter is to:
(1) Secure the future of the Rhode Island and New England economies, and their shared
environment, by making state and/or coordinated, cost-effective, strategic investments in energy
resources and infrastructure such that the New England states improve energy system reliability
and security; enhance economic competitiveness by reducing energy costs to attract new
investment and job growth opportunities; and protect the quality of life and environment for all
residents and businesses;
(2) Utilize state and/or coordinated competitive processes, in collaboration with other New
England states and their instrumentalities, to advance strategic investment in energy infrastructure
and energy resources, provided that the total energy security, reliability, environmental, and
economic benefits to the state of Rhode Island and its ratepayers exceed the costs of the projects,
and ensure that the benefits and costs of the energy infrastructure investments are shared
appropriately among the New England States; and
(3) Encourage an a balanced approach to energy policy that advances the objectives of

achieving a reliable, clean-energy future that is consistent with meeting greenhouse gas reduction
goals as established by chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021 act on climate”) at reasonable cost
affordable to ratepayers. If any provision of this chapter conflicts with the provisions of chapter 6.2
of title 42 ("2021 act on climate") the provisions of this chapter shall prevail.
39-31-3. Commercially reasonable defined. Definitions.
When used in this chapter, “commercially reasonable” (a) "Commercially reasonable"
means terms and pricing that are reasonably consistent with what an experienced power market
analyst would expect to see in transactions involving regional energy resources and regional energy
infrastructure. Commercially reasonable shall include having a credible project operation date, as
determined by the commission, but a project need not have completed the requisite permitting
process to be considered commercially reasonable. Commercially reasonable shall require a
determination by the commission that the benefits to Rhode Island exceed the cost of the project.
The commission shall determine, based on the preponderance of the evidence, that the total energy
security, reliability, environmental, and economic benefits to the state of Rhode Island and its
ratepayers exceed the costs of such projects. If there is a dispute about whether any terms or pricing
are commercially reasonable, the commission shall make the final determination after evidentiary
hearings.
(b) "Emission reduction mitigation" means a technology, process, or method of carbon
sequestration, that is recognized by the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency or as identified by
the office of energy resources that results in the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions from natural
gas transmission or electric generation.
39-31-4. Regional energy planning.
(a) Consistent with the purposes of this chapter, and utilizing regional stakeholder
processes where appropriate, the office of energy resources, in consultation and coordination with
the division of public utilities and carriers and the public utility company that provides electric
distribution as defined in § 39-1-2(a)(12) as well as natural gas as defined in § 39-1-2(a)(17), is
authorized to:
(1) Participate in the development and issuance of state, regional, or multistate competitive
solicitation(s) for the development and construction of regional electric-transmission projects that
would allow for the reliable transmission of large- or small-scale domestic or international
hydroelectric power to New England load centers that will benefit the state of Rhode Island and its
ratepayers, and such solicitations may be issued by the New England States Committee on
Electricity or the electric or natural gas distribution company to further the purposes of this chapter;
(2) Participate in the development and issuance of state, regional, or multistate competitive
LC000349 - Page 2 of 10

solicitation(s) for the development and construction of regional electric-transmission projects that
would allow for the reliable transmission of eligible renewable energy resources, including offshore
wind, as defined by § 39-26-5(a), to New England load centers that will benefit the state of Rhode
Island and its ratepayers, and the solicitations may be issued by the New England States Committee
on Electricity or the electric or natural gas distribution company to further the purposes of this
chapter; and
(3) Participate in the development and issuance of regional or multistate competitive
solicitation(s) for the development and construction of regional natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure
and capacity that will benefit the state of Rhode Island and its ratepayers by strengthening energy
system reliability and security and, in doing so, potentially mitigate energy price volatility that
threatens the economic vitality and competitiveness of Rhode Island residents and businesses. The
solicitations may be issued by the New England States Committee on Electricity or the electric or
natural gas distribution company to further the purposes of this chapter; and the solicitations may
request proposals that are priced in increments to allow for the evaluation of project costs and
benefits associated with adding various levels of additional, natural gas pipeline capacity into New
England and assist with the optimization of energy system reliability, economic, and other benefits
consistent with the purposes of this chapter.
(4) As part of any such state, regional, or multistate competitive solicitation processes
conducted pursuant to this chapter, the office of energy resources shall work jointly with the
division of public utilities and carriers, and with the electric distribution company as appropriate,
to identify incremental, natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity and/or electric-
transmission projects that optimize energy reliability, economic, environmental, and ratepayer
impacts for Rhode Island, consistent with the legislative findings and purpose of this chapter. The
office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers shall be authorized to utilize
expert consultants, as needed, to assist in any state, regional, multistate, or state-level determination
related to the procurement activities identified in § 39-31-5.
(5) Identify and participate in the development of regional or multistate emissions
reduction mitigation strategies to reduce emissions from natural gas transmission and generated
electricity. The office of energy resources shall participate in the identification, development, and
promote the use of emission mitigations for natural gas transmission and electric generation with
the New England States Committee on Electricity or the electric or natural gas distribution
company.
(b) Prior to any binding commitments being made by any agencies of the state, the electric
distribution company, or any other entity that would result in costs being incurred directly, or
LC000349 - Page 3 of 10

indirectly, by Rhode Island electric and/or gas consumers through distribution or commodity rates,
the office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers shall jointly file any
energy infrastructure project recommendation(s) with the public utilities commission and may
make such filing jointly with the electric or natural gas distribution company as appropriate. The
public utilities commission shall consider any such recommendation(s) as specified under § 39-31-
7.
(c) A copy of the filing made under subsection (b) of this section shall be provided to the
governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house, the department of environmental
management, and the commerce corporation.
(d) The electric distribution company shall be provided with a copy of any filing made
under this section at least ten (10) business days in advance of its filing with the public utilities
commission and the electric or gas distribution utility may file separate comments when the filing
is made.
(e) As part of any office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers
filing made pursuant to this chapter, the agencies shall identify the expected energy reliability,
energy security, and ratepayer impacts that are expected to result from commitments being made
in connection with the proposed project(s).
(f) The office of energy resources and division of public utilities and carriers reserve the
right to determine that energy infrastructure projects submitted in any state, regional, or multistate
competitive solicitation process are not in Rhode Island’s energy reliability, energy security, and/or
ratepayer interests, and shall make such findings available to the governor, the president of the
senate, and the speaker of the house. The electric or gas distribution utility may attach a separate
opinion to those findings, at its election.
39-31-5. State and regional energy procurement.
(a) Consistent with the purposes of this chapter, the public utility company that provides
electric distribution as defined in § 39-1-2(a)(12), as well as natural gas as defined in § 39-1-
2(a)(17), in consultation with the office of energy resources and the division of public utilities and
carriers is authorized to voluntarily and encouraged to participate in state, multistate, or regional
efforts to:
(1) Procure domestic or international large- or small-scale hydroelectric power and eligible
renewable energy resources, including wind, as defined by § 39-26-5(a), that seek to meet the
renewable energy standard goals of chapter 26 of this title but shall not be mandatory if such
renewable sources are not found to be commercially reasonable and affordable to ratepayers under
this chapter on behalf of electric ratepayers; provided, however, that large-scale hydroelectric
LC000349 - Page 4 of 10

power shall not be eligible under the renewable energy standard established by chapter 26 of this
title. If the provisions of this section conflict with the provisions of chapter 26 of this title, the
provisions of this section shall prevail;
(2) Procure incremental, natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity into New England
to help strengthen energy system reliability and facilitate the economic interests of the state and its
ratepayers. Provided that, any natural gas infrastructure or capacity procured that utilizes emissions
reduction mitigation shall be counted towards the statewide greenhouse gas emission reduction
mandate goals as defined by § 42-6.2-9. The office of energy resources shall determine the amount
of emissions reduction to attribute to each emission reduction mitigation identified;
(3) Support the development and filing of necessary tariffs and other appropriate cost-
recovery mechanisms, as proposed by the office of energy resources or the division of public
utilities and carriers, that allocate the costs of new, electric-transmission and natural-gas-pipeline
infrastructure and capacity projects selected pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to ratepayers,
such that costs are shared among participating states in an equitable manner; and
(4) To the extent that the public utility company that provides electric distribution as
defined in § 39-1-2(a)(12), as well as natural gas as defined in § 39-1-2(a)(17), pursues the
objectives identified above, the public utility company shall utilize all appropriate, competitive
processes, and maintain compliance with applicable federal and state siting laws.
(b) Any procurement authorized under this section shall be commercially reasonable.
(c) If any part of this chapter conflicts with chapter 26 of title 39 or chapter 6.2 of title 42
("2021 act on climate") the provisions of this chapter shall prevail.
39-31-7. Duties of the commission.
(a) The commission shall approve any proposals made by the electric and gas distribution
company that are commercially reasonable, affordable to ratepayers, and advance the purposes of
this chapter. The commission’s authority shall include, without limitation, the authority to:
(1) Approve long-term contracts entered into pursuant to the goals and provisions of this
chapter for large- or small-scale hydroelectric power and renewable energy resources that are
eligible under the renewable energy standard established by chapter 26 of this title; provided,
however, that large-scale hydroelectric power shall not be eligible under the renewable energy
standard established by chapter 26 of this title;
(2) Annually determine the adequacy of renewable energy supplies to meet the increase in
the percentage requirement of energy from renewable energy resources effective for the following
year. The commission shall annually publish the commission’s determination of adequacy on the
agency’s website;
LC000349 - Page 5 of 10

(2)(3) Approve long-term contracts for natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure and capacity
consistent with the purposes of this chapter;
(3)(4) Approve rate-recovery mechanisms proposed by the electric and gas distribution
companies relating to costs incurred under this chapter by the electric and gas distribution company
that facilitate the multistate or regional sharing of costs necessary to implement electric
transmission and natural-gas-pipeline infrastructure projects pursued under this chapter, including
any costs incurred through the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission approved tariffs related to
such multistate or regional energy infrastructure procurements;
(4)(5) Address any proposed changes to standard-offer procurements, standard-offer
pricing, and retail-choice rules;
(5)(6) Provide for the recovery of reasonable net costs from all distribution customers
incurred by the electric and gas distribution company in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter
that may include, but are not limited to, costs to solicit, evaluate, and seek approval of such
contracts as well as net costs incurred under any contracts approved by the commission under this
section and costs associated with the management of incremental capacity resulting from interstate
gas-pipeline-expansion projects pursued pursuant to this chapter and costs associated with
investments in local gas-distribution-network assets necessary to implement such interstate gas-
pipeline-expansion projects;
(6)(7) Nothing herein is intended to prohibit the commission from allowing the electric
distribution company to use the energy, capacity, and other attributes purchased for resale to
customers and approve tariffs that charge those customers for the energy, capacity, and other
attributes from the resale to those customers; and/or to use the NE-GIS certificates for purposes of
meeting the obligations set forth in chapter 26 of this title (“renewable energy standard”);
(7)(8) Approve cost allocation proposals filed by the gas distribution company and/or the
electric distribution company that appropriately allocate offshore wind costs incurred under § 39-
31-10, natural gas infrastructure and capacity costs incurred under § 39-31-6 between electric and
gas distribution customers of the electric and gas distribution company in a manner proportional to
the energy benefits accrued by Rhode Island’s gas and electric customers from making such
investments. In making its determination, the commission shall consider projected reductions in
regional, wholesale electric prices as a benefit that accrues to electric ratepayers. The allocation of
costs shall include all distribution customers, regardless from whom they are purchasing their
commodity service; and
(8)(9) Approve any other proposed regulatory or ratemaking changes that reasonably
advance the goals set forth herein.
LC000349 - Page 6 of 10

(b) The grant of authorizations under this chapter shall not be construed as creating a
mandate or obligation on the part of the electric and gas distribution company to enter into any
contracts or file any proposals pursuant to this chapter.
(c) The public utilities commission shall docket any proposals made by the office of energy
resources and division of public utilities and carriers pursuant to § 39-31-4. Docket materials shall
be posted and maintained on the commission’s website. The commission shall conduct
proceedings, as provided below, solely for the purpose of determining whether the proposed
infrastructure projects, if implemented, are in the public interest and no commitments shall be valid
or authorized without such finding being made by the commission. The validity and approval of
any commitments made by the electric or gas distribution company in furtherance of the purposes
of this chapter shall be separate and subject to § 39-31-5. The docket opened pursuant to this
subsection shall proceed as follows:
(1) The following state agencies shall provide advisory opinions to the commission on the
topics specified below within sixty (60) days from the docketing date:
(i) The department of environmental management (DEM) shall provide an advisory
opinion on the expected greenhouse gas emissions and statewide environmental impacts, including
on forests and the oceans, resulting from the proposed project(s), including a determination as to
whether the proposed project(s) advance the goals of chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021 Act on
Climate”).
(ii) The commerce corporation shall provide an advisory opinion on the expected statewide
economic impacts resulting from the proposed project(s).
(2) The commission shall notify the aforementioned agencies upon the filing of any
proposal made under this section, and notify them of any related hearings and/or proceedings.
(3) Advisory opinions issued by agencies designated under subsection (c)(1) of this section
shall not be considered as final decisions of the agencies making the opinions and shall not be
subject to judicial review under § 42-35-15 or any other provision of the general laws.
(4) Upon completion of the sixty-day (60) advisory-opinion period, the commission shall
provide for a thirty-day (30) public comment period on any energy infrastructure project(s) selected
pursuant to this chapter and hold evidentiary hearings. In addition to evidentiary hearings, the
commission shall also hold at least one public hearing to accept public comment on the proposal(s)
prior to an open meeting held pursuant to this section. The commission shall also seek input from
the ratepayer's advisory board established under § 39-1-37.1 before the end of the thirty (30) day
public comment period.
(5) The commission shall hold an open meeting no later than one hundred twenty (120)
LC000349 - Page 7 of 10

days from the date of filing by the office of energy resources and division of public utilities and
carriers and shall certify that the proposed project(s) are in the public interest if, in the commission’s
determination, and in consideration of filed advisory opinions and the opinion of the electric or gas
distribution utility, the proposed infrastructure project(s):
(i) Are consistent with the findings and purposes of this chapter;
(ii) Will benefit Rhode Island by improving local and regional energy system reliability
and security;
(iii) Will benefit Rhode Island ratepayers by offering the potential for reduced energy price
volatility and reduction of energy supply costs in the context of an integrated regional energy
system;
(iv) Will not cause unacceptable harm to the environment and are consistent with, seeks to
reasonably meet the greenhouse gas reduction goals established in chapter 6.2 of title 42 (the “2021
Act on Climate”) and does not conflict with this chapter; and
(v) Will enhance not harm the economic fabric growth of the state.
(6) The commission shall issue a written determination of its findings within ten (10)
business days of its open-meeting decision and provide copies of that determination, along with
copies of all advisory opinions, public comment, and any other materials deemed relevant to the
commission determination, to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house,
the commissioner of the office of energy resources, and the administrator of the division of public
utilities and carriers.
(d) A determination issued by the commission shall constitute the sole, final, binding, and
determinative regulatory decision within the state for the purpose of authorizing the state to support
a proposed, regional energy-infrastructure project(s) that is funded through the Federal Energy
Regulatory Commission approved tariffs on a regional and/or multistate basis pursuant to this
chapter. Appeals shall be governed by § 39-5-1.
(e) Upon issuance of a written determination by the commission finding that the proposed
project(s) is in the public interest, the office of energy resources and division of public utilities and
carriers shall, on behalf of the state, be authorized to support any state, regional, and/or multistate
process necessary to implement the project(s), including, without limitation, supporting any
necessary and related Federal Energy Regulatory Commission filings; provided, however, that any
commitments made by the electric or gas distribution company to implement the proposals remain
voluntary and subject to § 39-31-5.
(f) Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude the electric or gas distribution
company from making a filing under § 39-31-6, simultaneous with a filing under this section by
LC000349 - Page 8 of 10

the office of energy resources and the division of public utilities and carriers, in which case the
filings made under §§ 39-31-6 and 39-31-7 shall be consolidated.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000349
========
LC000349 - Page 9 of 10